Maryland, session 2025, SB0069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Health shall study and make recommendations
on the feasibility of installing and maintaining landline telephone systems in assisted living
facilities, psychiatric facilities, and nursing homes.
(b) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Department shall:
(1) for each type of facility described in subsection (a) of this section:
(i) examine the existing state of telephone accessibility, including
the availability, privacy, and usability of the telephone provided, if any;
(ii) evaluate the cost and logistics related to providing landline
telephones in individual rooms or communal spaces, including:
1. labor;
2. equipment;
3. installation; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0069*

SENATE BILL 69
4. ongoing maintenance costs;
(iii) assess the practical benefits for residents and staff, including:
1. enhancing social interaction;
2. access to support services; and
3. emergency preparedness; and
(iv) identify potential barriers to providing a landline telephone,
including:
1. infrastructure limitations;
2. regulatory requirements;
3. technological infrastructure;
4. ongoing maintenance needs; and
5. any facility–specific barriers;
(2) identify any circumstances under which a resident’s access to a landline
telephone may require limitation, including for safety, medical and mental health, and
behavioral and security needs;
(3) identify and assess any potential alternatives to providing landline
telephones;
(4) present a comparative analysis of costs, including any differences
between public and private assisted living facilities, psychiatric facilities, and nursing
homes;
(5) identify available and potential federal, State, and local funding
options; and
(6) consult with the following stakeholders and entities:
(i) representatives from assisted living facilities, psychiatric
facilities, and nursing homes;
(ii) advocacy organizations for seniors, individuals with disabilities,
and individuals with mental health illnesses; and
(iii) residents and their families.

SENATE BILL 69 3
(c) On or before September 30, 2026, the Maryland Department of Health shall
submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the Senate Finance Committee and
the House Health and Government Operations Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.